Utah statutes.
10-2-601.   Consolidation of two or more municipalities.

The process for consolidating municipalities shall begin by filing with the county legislative bodies of the respective counties in which the municipalities are located:

(1)  resolutions passed by the governing bodies of the municipalities which state their intention and desire to form a consolidated municipality; or

(2)  petitions signed by at least 10% of the registered voters in each of the municipalities to be included with the boundaries of the consolidated municipality.

